Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Refunds to Local Governments.

Sec. 43.75.130.
Refund to local governments.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, the commissioner shall pay

to each unified municipality and to each city located in the unorganized borough, 50 percent of the amount of tax revenue collected in the municipality from taxes levied under this chapter;

to each city located within a borough, 25 percent of the amount of tax revenue collected in the city from taxes levied under this chapter; and

to each borough

50 percent of the amount of tax revenue collected in the area of the borough outside cities from taxes levied under this chapter; and

25 percent of the amount of tax revenue collected in cities located within the borough from taxes levied under this chapter.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 61 SLA 2014.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 79 SLA 1986.]

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a)(2) and (a)(3)(B) of this section, the commissioner shall pay

to each city that is located in a borough incorporated after June 16, 1987 the following percentages of the tax revenue collected in the city from taxes levied under this chapter:

45 percent of the taxes collected during the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated;

40 percent of the taxes collected during the first calendar year after the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated;

35 percent of the taxes collected during the second calendar year after the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated; and

30 percent of the taxes collected during the third calendar year after the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated; and

to each borough that is incorporated after June 16, 1987 the following percentages of the tax revenue collected in the cities located within the borough from taxes levied under this chapter:

5 percent of the taxes collected during the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated;

10 percent of the taxes collected during the first calendar year after the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated;

15 percent of the taxes collected during the second calendar year after the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated; and

20 percent of the taxes collected during the third calendar year after the calendar year in which the borough is incorporated.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (d) of this section, a city may adopt an ordinance to transfer a portion of the funds received under (d)(1) of this section to the borough in which the city is located.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 57 SLA 2003.]

In this section, “tax revenue collected” includes the amount credited against taxes under AS

43.75.018

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 155 SLA 1962; am § 75 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 79 SLA 1979; am § 10 ch 117 SLA 1981; am § 73 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 4, 7 ch 79 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 1987; am §§ 1, 2 ch 80 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2003; am § 20 ch 51 SLA 2012; am §§ 14, 20 ch 61 SLA 2014; am §§ 1, 2 ch 35 SLA 2015)

Delayed repeal of subsection (g). —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, subsection (g) as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, is repealed December 31, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (g) was enacted as (d) and relettered as (f) in 1987 and as (g) in 2003.
Subsection (f) was enacted as (g) and relettered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (f), substituted “a credit under AS

43.75.035

or

43.75.036

” for “a credit under AS

43.75.035

,

43.75.036

, or AS

43.98.030

”.

The 2015 amendment, effective December 31, 2016, amending this section, as amended by SLA 2014 ch 61 § 14, in (f), deleted “or AS

43.98.030

” following “a credit under AS

43.75.035

”.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 4,
ch. 57, SLA 2003, subsection (f) is retroactive to January 1, 2003.
Under § 5,
ch. 57, SLA 2003, the conditional repeal of subsection (f) under § 7(2),
ch. 57, SLA 2003 is also made retroactive to January 1, 2003.

Sec. 43.75.133.
Provision of information to municipalities.

If the mayor, manager, or administrator of a municipality makes a written request, the department shall furnish the mayor, manager, or administrator of the municipality the names of all fisheries businesses that have filed tax returns under this chapter in which the fisheries business listed the municipality as the location in which the fisheries business processed a fisheries resource subject to the tax imposed under this chapter.

If the mayor, manager, or administrator of a municipality makes a written request, the department shall verify that, as to a tax levied and collected by the municipality that is based on the value of fisheries resource processed in or transported to or within the municipality, the value of the fisheries resources reported by a fisheries business to the municipality and the value of the fisheries resources reported by the fisheries business to the department under this chapter are substantially the same. If the values are not substantially the same, the department shall permit the mayor, manager, or administrator of the municipality to inspect tax returns filed by the fisheries business with the department under this chapter, or shall furnish to the municipal officer a copy of the tax returns, if the department determines that the municipality provides adequate safeguards for the confidentiality of the returns and that the returns will be used by the municipality only for purposes of collection of its tax levied and collected on fisheries resources. In this subsection, the value of the fisheries resources reported by the fisheries business to the department and the value reported to the municipality are substantially the same if the values are equal or the variance between them does not exceed one percent of the greater value.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1988)

Sec. 43.75.135.
Additional refund to boroughs and cities. [Repealed, § 13 ch 79 SLA 1979.]

Sec. 43.75.136.
Appropriations to Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank. [Repealed, § 20 ch 117 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 43.75.137.
Additional refund.

To the extent that appropriations are available for the purpose, and notwithstanding the requirement of AS

37.07.080(e)

that approval of the office of management and budget is required, an amount equal to 50 percent of the tax revenue that is collected under this chapter from fisheries businesses and is not subject to division with a municipality under AS

43.75.130

shall be transmitted each fiscal year, without the approval of the office of management and budget, by the department to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for disbursal to eligible municipalities under AS

29.60.450

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 195 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 53 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(11), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.75.140.
[Renumbered as AS 43.75.290.]